Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5880XC (1) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 39.2, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. For any political subdivision of this state, if the 3 special election is in whole or in part for the question of 4 issuing bonds or other indebtedness, the first Tuesday after 5 the first Monday in November in each year, or the first Tuesday 6 after the first Monday in June in each even-numbered year . 7